public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.aff
PFX a 0 שמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמה וו
PFX a 0 שמה" .
PFX a 0 שמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמכ וו
PFX a 0 שמכ" .
PFX a 0 שמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמש [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמש וו
PFX a 0 שמש" .
PFX a 0 שמשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשב וו
PFX a 0 שמשב" .
PFX a 0 שמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשבכ וו
PFX a 0 שמשבכ" .
PFX a 0 שמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשה וו
PFX a 0 שמשה" .
PFX a 0 שמשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכ וו
PFX a 0 שמשכ" .
PFX a 0 שמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכב וו
PFX a 0 שמשכב" .
PFX a 0 שמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשככ וו
PFX a 0 שמשככ" .
PFX a 0 שמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכל וו
PFX a 0 שמשכל" .
PFX a 0 שמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכמ וו
PFX a 0 שמשכמ" .
PFX a 0 שמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשכמה וו
PFX a 0 שמשכמה" .
PFX a 0 שמשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשל וו
PFX a 0 שמשל" .
PFX a 0 שמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשלכ וו
PFX a 0 שמשלכ" .
PFX a 0 שמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשמ וו
PFX a 0 שמשמ" .
PFX a 0 שמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשמה וו
PFX a 0 שמשמה" .
PFX a 0 שמשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמשמכ וו
PFX a 0 שמשמכ" .
PFX a 0 שמשמכו ו[^ו]

PFX b N 58
PFX b 0 ו .
PFX b 0 ו" .
PFX b 0 וכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 וכש וו
PFX b 0 וכש" .
PFX b 0 וכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 ולכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 ולכש וו
PFX b 0 ולכש" .
PFX b 0 ולכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 ומש [^ו]
PFX b 0 ומש וו
PFX b 0 ומש" .
PFX b 0 ומשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 וש [^ו]
PFX b 0 וש וו
PFX b 0 וש" .
PFX b 0 ושו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 ושכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 ושכש וו
PFX b 0 ושכש" .
PFX b 0 ושכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 ושלכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 ושלכש וו
PFX b 0 ושלכש" .
PFX b 0 ושלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 ושמש [^ו]
PFX b 0 ושמש וו
PFX b 0 ושמש" .
PFX b 0 ושמשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 כש [^ו]
PFX b 0 כש וו
PFX b 0 כש" .
PFX b 0 כשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 לכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 לכש וו
PFX b 0 לכש" .
PFX b 0 לכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 מש [^ו]
PFX b 0 מש וו
PFX b 0 מש" .
PFX b 0 משו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 ש [^ו]
PFX b 0 ש וו
PFX b 0 ש" .
PFX b 0 שו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 שכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 שכש וו
PFX b 0 שכש" .
PFX b 0 שכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 שלכש [^ו]
PFX b 0 שלכש וו
PFX b 0 שלכש" .
PFX b 0 שלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX b 0 שמש [^ו]
PFX b 0 שמש וו
PFX b 0 שמש" .
PFX b 0 שמשו ו[^ו]
