public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.dic
אאייר/b
אאשרן/b
אבחנתין/b
אבערכם/b
אבר/a
אגדעכן/b
אגרפוכם/b
אדוק/a
אדיחכם/b
אהגנה/b
אוברולים/a
אווסתנו/b
אוזלת/a
אוכלנה/b
אולרים/a
אופטומטריה/a
אופרז/b
אורגות/a
אוששנוך/b
אותה/a
אזכרתיכן/b
אחבבם/b
אחילהו/b
אחצוץ/b
אחר/a
אטוח/b
אטרידכן/b
איגלואים/a
איזנוני/b
אייסרנו/b
איכויות/a
אימנתוה/b
אימתני/a
אינטראקציה/a
איסלנדיים/a
אישרנוהו/b
אכחידך/b
אכילים/a
אכפוהו/b
אלבשה/b
אליטיסט/a
אלקטרואופטיקה/a
אמגרה/b
אמזונות/a
אמללתן/b
אמתגהו/b
אנאלפביתיות/a
אנטגוניסטים/a
אניחנו/b
אנפין/a
אנציחהו/b
אסוגר/b
אסייתיות/a
אסלמתיה/b
אסרסה/b
אעזבנה/b
אעצרה/b
אפונק/b
אפוסים/a
אפעימה/b
אפקטיביים/a
אפרעך/b
אצחקק/b
אצרידכם/b
אקדוחנים/a
אקטפנו/b
אקסטטי/a
אקצנו/b
ארגנטיניות/a
ארדפכם/b
ארכוב/a
ארכשך/b
אשאילנו/b
אשופץ/b
אשכוליות/a
אשכיבם/b
אשמנה/b
אשפרן/b
אשתכר/b
אתואם/b
אתכנננה/b
אתנולוגיות/a
אתעצבן/b
אתרגם/b
בדיון/a
בוהמיים/a
בוילתי/b
בולמות/a
בורגנים/a
בחנוכן/b
בטטות/a
ביוש/a
ביזיתוה/b
ביימתי/b
ביסקוויט/a
ביצעו/b
ביקשתון/b
ביתרתון/b
בלדר/a
בלרינות/a
בעייתית/a
בעלתיני/b
ברוטליות/a
ברקן/a
גאוצנטרי/a
גדוע/a
גודפתם/b
גוזלת/a
גופים/a
גזעיות/a
גיבבתהו/b
גיחכוני/b
גיל/a
גימדתיכן/b
גלגלית/a
גמול/a
גמלתינו/b
גנרטורים/a
גרוס/a
גשומות/a
דגוש/a
דוגמת/a
דוכדכתן/b
דועך/a
דחקתום/b
דיאטנים/a
דייני/a
דיסק/a
דירגתיכן/b
דלמטיים/a
דפדפת/a
דקלמתיני/b
דרדר/a
האבסתיכם/b
האזנה/a
האצילתן/b
הבהלתוך/b
הבלטתיני/b
הבעתיכם/b
הברשות/a
הגבהנוכם/b
הגחכנו/b
הגרילתן/b
הדבקתוני/b
הדהרנום/b
הדוניסטית/a
הדממנון/b
הואצלתם/b
הוברחת/b
הודגמנו/b
הוזלתיכם/b
הוחרדו/b
הוכחתיני/b
הולדתיכם/b
הולכות/a
הומעטו/b
הוסטו/b
הועליתי/b
הופנמה/b
הוצהבת/b
הוקלטו/b
הוקעה/a
הורגלתן/b
הורשנו/b
הושיבתנו/b
הושרית/b
הזדכה/b
הזליפתנו/b
הזעיקתך/b
הזרעה/a
החבאתיני/b
החייתום/b
החלפתיכם/b
החרדתיהו/b
החשיכתם/b
הטיחתו/b
הטן/b
הטריחוה/b
היאזקויות/a
הידמות/a
היחלשות/a
הימשות/a
היסרקות/a
היצברות/a
הישרדויות/a
הכאבת/b
הכינונוכן/b
הכלנוה/b
הכפילוהו/b
הכרעתון/b
הכתמנוהו/b
הלבשתין/b
הלה/a
הלחנתיה/b
המטרתון/b
המירים/a
המצאתיהו/b
המתון/b
הנחיתינו/b
הנסתוהו/b
הנשימתכן/b
הנשמה/a
הסוויתיה/b
הסעירתהו/b
הסתבכתי/b
הסתכסכות/a
העבדנוכם/b
העלבתיהו/b
העניקתנו/b
העריכוכן/b
העתקתים/b
הפוכה/a
הפיצותכן/b
הפנינוכם/b
הפקדנו/b
הפרטתינו/b
הפשטתון/b
הצדקנוכן/b
הצטדקויות/a
הצילתו/b
הצמיתתנו/b
הצרוהו/b
הקהית/b
הקימונום/b
הקלשות/a
הקנם/b
הקציתיו/b
הקרנתיהו/b
הרבנו/b
הרדימוני/b
הרחתהו/b
הרכבה/a
הרכינתך/b
הרעישתה/b
הרקתונו/b
השאלנום/b
השגתוך/b
השחזות/a
השחלנו/b
השימוהו/b
השכמתיהו/b
השמדתיו/b
השנאתוה/b
השקיטתך/b
השרתוה/b
השתחלפות/a
השתלטת/b
התאהבתם/b
התאוששות/a
התבזו/b
התברגנות/a
התדרדרתי/b
התחזויות/a
התחלתונו/b
התייפייפות/a
התייפתה/b
התלחשתם/b
התמחות/a
התמתנתי/b
התנענעות/a
התנשקתן/b
התערסלות/a
התערפלת/b
התפקרתי/b
התקדשות/a
התקצרת/b
התרמה/a
התשתון/b
ויזיגותית/a
ורדרדות/a
זהרים/a
זורם/a
זזו/b
זימנון/b
זכאי/a
זכרתוה/b
זעום/a
זריעה/a
חבשתיכן/b
חגיגות/a
חודרות/a
חולצה/a
חוץ/a
חושניים/a
חזינו/b
חטיבתיות/a
חידשכם/b
חיילתהו/b
חיישנים/a
חילקתיכן/b
חיסנוני/b
חישובים/a
חישלנוהו/b
חלחלות/a
חמורה/a
חנוקים/a
חנקתם/b
חפונות/a
חקלאית/a
חרמש/a
חשפנוהו/b
חשפנות/a
טבעוניות/a
טונה/a
טורקי/a
טושטשתי/b
טיפוגרפית/a
טיפחה/b
טלפוניות/a
טף/a
טרויקה/a
טרמינליים/a
יאבדך/b
יאודה/b
יאחסנוה/b
יאמצן/b
יאריכון/b
יבהילוהו/b
יבואנית/a
יבחרוכם/b
יבליג/b
יבצעון/b
יבשל/b
יגדעהו/b
יגישונו/b
יגרילכם/b
ידהימכם/b
ידכאו/b
ידקלמוכם/b
יהללום/b
יודאיקה/a
יודבק/b
יוטל/b
יוסג/b
יוצב/b
יורישנו/b
יותקלו/b
יזומות/a
יזילו/b
יזעיקנה/b
יחביאן/b
יחזיקוך/b
יחלוץ/b
יחמשנה/b
יחרימוה/b
יחתלוה/b
יטיסוהו/b
יטעכן/b
ייבשתן/b
ייוותרו/b
ייטלוהו/b
יימצץ/b
ייסופים/a
ייעתרו/b
ייצרתו/b
יישאכן/b
יישרוני/b
יכווננו/b
יכל/b
יכעיסוהו/b
יכרתוך/b
ילבשוכם/b
ילחצהו/b
ימגנכן/b
ימטירון/b
ימנע/b
ימקמון/b
ימתיקך/b
ינום/b
יניסוני/b
ינערנה/b
ינקדוכן/b
יסבירון/b
יסודי/a
יסונתז/b
יסיתוה/b
יסממנו/b
יסריטונו/b
יעגלוני/b
יעידו/b
יעמלנוכן/b
יעקל/b
יעשה/b
יפוספסו/b
יפיצונו/b
יפעימה/b
יפרטוכם/b
יפרשון/b
יצדיקוכם/b
יציירכן/b
יצמררכם/b
יקבץ/b
יקזז/b
יקירים/a
יקישום/b
יקפיאוכן/b
יקריבך/b
ירגיעה/b
ירוששוכם/b
ירכיבני/b
ירעיפנו/b
ירשמוה/b
ישביחכן/b
ישוברו/b
ישחזרכם/b
ישיטו/b
ישככו/b
ישלמכן/b
ישמעאליים/a
ישנאוה/b
ישפטוך/b
ישקצוכן/b
ישתיקה/b
יתארו/b
יתגרען/b
יתחילן/b
יתישום/b
יתמצק/b
יתעופף/b
יתפקששו/b
יתקרבו/b
כדורגלנית/a
כוירנו/b
כולי/a
כותפת/a
כיבסנוך/b
כיניתו/b
כיסופים/a
כליל/a
כליתן/b
כנענים/a
כרבולת/a
כשף/a
לבידים/a
לובשת/a
לוליינית/a
לחשוש/a
ליבב/b
לינאריות/a
לכלכתה/b
לסבי/a
לקסיקליות/a
מאובנים/a
מאומללת/a
מאחה/a
מאנגלז/a
מבאסות/a
מבולגן/a
מבטיחה/a
מבעים/a
מגבון/a
מגודרות/a
מגזר/a
מגמרת/a
מדבג/a
מדוכדכת/a
מדיצינית/a
מדרוניות/a
מהופכת/a
מואדרת/a
מובלעת/a
מוגפים/a
מודרניים/a
מוזעק/a
מוחקים/a
מוך/a
מוכתמת/a
מומיה/a
מונופוליסטים/a
מוסווים/a
מועטות/a
מופטר/a
מופשרת/a
מוקדם/a
מוקרמת/a
מורעפות/a
מושטים/a
מושרשות/a
מזדהמים/a
מזוינים/a
מזכרים/a
מזריע/a
מחויבים/a
מחושבות/a
מחישות/a
מחניקים/a
מחצתה/b
מחרישות/a
מטדורים/a
מטייל/a
מטרופוליניים/a
מיובאות/a
מיותם/a
מייננת/a
מיליונית/a
מינוהו/b
מינרלי/a
מישור/a
מכולות/a
מכייפת/a
מכפיפים/a
מכרתן/b
מלאכותי/a
מלוכני/a
מליצית/a
ממגנטת/a
ממוסטלת/a
ממחזרת/a
ממסדית/a
ממשיל/a
מנהיג/a
מנומרת/a
מנחים/a
מנסח/a
מנשנשת/a
מסוגננות/a
מסועפים/a
מסיימת/a
מסמלצות/a
מסרגות/a
מסתלבטות/a
מעגליים/a
מעונג/a
מעטרות/a
מענה/a
מערטלת/a
מפוגגים/a
מפוקח/a
מפטפט/a
מפלצתי/a
מפקירה/a
מפשירה/a
מצוינות/a
מצטבעות/a
מציאותיים/a
מצמצמות/a
מקבילות/a
מקולח/a
מקושרות/a
מקלעות/a
מקצוענות/a
מקשיח/a
מרובע/a
מרוקנות/a
מריעים/a
מרפאת/a
מרתכים/a
משהקים/a
משויות/a
משועתקים/a
משחיל/a
משכוכית/a
משכום/b
משמיט/a
משעשעות/a
משקפים/a
משתופפת/a
משתמט/a
מת/a
מתאספות/a
מתבייתות/a
מתגיירת/a
מתהפנטים/a
מתוירים/a
מתורגמות/a
מתחלקים/a
מתחתנים/a
מתיישנות/a
מתכרסם/a
מתמוללות/a
מתמקמים/a
מתנזרים/a
מתסכלות/a
מתענות/a
מתפוררים/a
מתפקששות/a
מתקלחת/a
מתרבים/a
מתרעננות/a
נאלצים/a
נאנסך/b
נבזה/a
נביכך/b
נגדכם/a
נגויר/b
נגרמת/a
נדוקדק/b
נדפק/a
נובלים/a
נוגדר/b
נוחתים/a
נוער/a
נוצחתן/b
נורש/a
נזמינכם/b
נזעק/a
נחכרתי/b
נחלשת/a
נחשקות/a
נחתוך/b
נטרקתי/b
ניאותה/a
ניווטתיכם/b
ניחרה/a
נילבל/b
ניפוק/a
ניפצונו/b
ניקיתי/b
נכבדת/a
נכבלה/b
נכשכש/b
נלבל/a
נמזגך/b
נמכרים/a
נמתיקכם/b
ננוגרמים/a
ננצרה/b
נסיקה/a
נסכרתי/b
נעוצבן/b
נעלם/a
נערבבם/b
נפוליטניות/a
נפנפנוכם/b
נפרצת/a
נצבעה/b
נצרכת/a
נקדימה/b
נקמנים/a
נקראכן/b
נרמם/b
נרעד/a
נשדוד/b
נשוכות/a
נשכתבכם/b
נשענים/a
נשקיטנו/b
נתגברך/b
נתמניתם/b
נתקעים/a
נתרבתהו/b
סגנונית/a
סוברניות/a
סולידי/a
סופרנובות/a
סורסה/b
סחטנות/a
סטנדאפיסטים/a
סיגרים/a
סיכלם/b
סיליקט/a
סינקרטיים/a
סיקלוך/b
סככה/a
סלפים/a
סמ"רים/a
סף/a
ספקטרליות/a
סקלוך/b
סקסונית/a
סרקסטית/a
עגלגלה/a
עוויתות/a
עוקבות/a
עטות/a
עטיתם/b
עימתו/b
עיצוריים/a
עלוקה/a
עמלנתיכן/b
ענב/a
עצביות/a
עקמימויות/a
ערמומי/a
עתיר/a
פברקתם/b
פדרליות/a
פוטנציה/a
פומבית/a
פועמת/a
פורסים/a
פחחייה/a
פטרת/a
פיאר/b
פייסן/a
פיסטוקים/a
פיעמת/b
פישרתיה/b
פיתולים/a
פליים/a
פמפלט/a
פנקייקים/a
פסיכומטרית/a
פעלתנית/a
פקסימיליות/a
פרוגרמטיים/a
פרוע/a
פריזאיות/a
פרמיה/a
פרעתכם/b
פרפרים/a
פתוחים/a
צברים/a
צוחקת/a
צח/a
צילינדר/a
צימחנו/b
צליאק/a
צנומים/a
צפינה/a
צרצור/a
קבעתני/b
קדחתני/a
קודחות/a
קולוניאליות/a
קומוניקטיביים/a
קונטרפונקט/a
קונקורדנציות/a
קוקוס/a
קטטוניה/a
קיבצהו/b
קידומים/a
קינחתיכם/b
קיפודיים/a
קלוץ/a
קלסרים/a
קמצנית/a
קסל"ש/a
קצורה/a
קצרתון/b
קרונות/a
קריסות/a
קרש/a
ראליים/a
רבתא/a
רדיואקטיביים/a
רווחים/a
רומניים/a
רופדתן/b
רזוננס/a
ריבוני/a
ריססתני/b
רישה/a
רמוזה/a
רעון/b
רעילים/a
רפלקסים/a
רקדן/a
רתום/a
שביעיסטית/a
שדריות/a
שוזר/a
שוחזרה/b
שומרוני/a
שורצים/a
שחט/b
שחמטאיות/a
שיגעונית/a
שידרתוה/b
שימון/a
שימנם/b
שיקמתיכם/b
שכבתיות/a
שלהבתונו/b
שלום/a
שמאלנים/a
שנאוצר/a
שעשעוני/b
שפויות/a
שקיקה/a
שרירותיות/a
תא/a
תאבזרנה/b
תאושררי/b
תאמדיני/b
תארכתני/b
תבוסתניים/a
תבורי/b
תביעי/b
תבקעום/b
תגברנוך/b
תגיירין/b
תגרשיהו/b
תדחיה/b
תדפנים/b
תהרגיהו/b
תואמים/a
תווסתוך/b
תוכרתו/b
תועידנו/b
תופחות/a
תוקצנו/b
תושרשי/b
תזינון/b
תזמורות/a
תזרז/b
תחולצי/b
תחלימי/b
תחצצו/b
תחקורים/a
תחתימון/b
תטמאהו/b
תיארון/b
תיוחדו/b
תיטפל/b
תיישבים/b
תינוקייה/a
תינתזנה/b
תיצמתו/b
תישלל/b
תכושף/b
תכננת/b
תכרתכם/b
תלאובה/a
תלוטפו/b
תלקקונו/b
תמחקכם/b
תמסורות/a
תמסרהו/b
תמשכום/b
תנוענעו/b
תנמנם/b
תנצרים/b
תסגירכם/b
תסיטכם/b
תסממוה/b
תסתיים/b
תעוללנה/b
תעלומה/a
תעמידינו/b
תעקפנו/b
תפגשכם/b
תפיצום/b
תפענחה/b
תפקיד/a
תפרנסו/b
תפתריה/b
תציירינו/b
תצפיניכם/b
תקולקל/b
תקלטריה/b
תקציבוך/b
תקר/a
תרבתוכן/b
תרושתי/b
תרססיהו/b
תרפיות/a
תרשמינו/b
תשדלוה/b
תשזרי/b
תשילכן/b
תשלטטו/b
תשנים/b
תשצפו/b
תשתחררנה/b
תתאריכן/b
תתהפכי/b
תתחקרום/b
תתלטשו/b
תתנשמי/b
תתפלספו/b
תתקרא/b
